District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-514

Waiver of lessee’s objections.

(a)

In rejecting goods, a lessee’s failure to state a particular defect that is ascertainable by reasonable inspection precludes the lessee from relying on the defect to justify rejection or to establish default:

(1)

If, stated seasonably, the lessor or the supplier could have cured it (§ 28:2A-513); or

(2)

Between merchants if the lessor or the supplier after rejection has made a request in writing for a full and final written statement of all defects on which the lessee proposes to rely.

(b)

A lessee’s failure to reserve rights when paying rent or other consideration against documents precludes recovery of the payment for defects apparent in the documents.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 4(d), 60 DCR 2634

History

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-514.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-299 substituted “apparent in the documents” for “apparent on the face of the documents” in (b).

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-605.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Purposes: The principles applicable to the commercial practice of payment against documents (subsection 2) are explained in official comment 4 to Section 2-605, the statutory analogue to this section.

Cross Reference:Section 2-605 official comment 4.

Definitional Cross References: “Between merchants”. Section 2-104(3).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).

“Seasonably”. Section 1-204(3).

“Supplier”. Section 2A-103(1)(x).

“Writing”. Section 1-201(46).